Hawaii statutes.
§431:11-107 Examination. (a) Subject
to the limitation contained in this section and in addition to the powers that
the commissioner has under article 2 relating to the examination of insurers,
the commissioner may examine any insurer registered under section 431:11-105 as
reasonably necessary to ascertain the financial condition of the insurer,
including the enterprise risk to the insurer by the ultimate controlling party,
or by any entity or combination of entities within the insurance holding company
system, or by the insurance holding company system on a consolidated basis.

(b) To evaluate whether the operations of an
ultimate controlling person, affiliate, or any combination of entities within
the insurance holding company system may adversely and materially affect the
operations, management, or financial condition of an insurer, the commissioner
may order any insurer registered under section 431:11-105 to:

(1) Produce the records, books, or other information
in the possession of the insurer or its affiliates that are reasonably
necessary to determine compliance with this article; and

(2) Determine compliance with this article, produce
information not in the possession of the insurer if the insurer can obtain
access to that information pursuant to contractual relationships, statutory
obligations, or other methods. In the event the insurer cannot obtain the
information requested by the commissioner, the insurer shall provide the
commissioner a detailed explanation of the reason that the insurer cannot
obtain the information and the identity of the holder of information. Whenever
it appears to the commissioner that the detailed explanation is without merit,
the commissioner may require, after notice and hearing, the insurer to pay a
penalty of not less than $100 and not more than $500 for each day's delay, or
may suspend or revoke the insurer's license.

(c) The commissioner may retain at the
registered insurer's expense attorneys, actuaries, accountants, and other
experts not otherwise a part of the commissioner's staff as shall be reasonably
necessary to assist in the conduct of the examination under subsections (a) and
(e). Any persons so retained shall be under the direction and control of the
commissioner and shall act in a purely advisory capacity.

(d) Each registered insurer producing for
examination records, books, and papers pursuant to subsections (a) and (e)
shall be liable for and shall pay the expense of the examination in accordance
with article 2.

(e) In the event that:

(1) An insurer fails to comply with an order pursuant
to subsection (b); or

(2) The commissioner, upon evaluating whether the
operations of an ultimate controlling person, affiliate, or any combination of
entities within the insurance holding company system pursuant to subsection
(b), has reasonable cause to believe that:

(A) The operations of the ultimate
controlling person, affiliate, or any combination of entities within the
insurance holding company system may adversely and materially affect the
operations, management, or financial condition of an insurer; or

(B) The commissioner is unable to obtain
relevant information from the controlled insurer,

the commissioner may examine the ultimate
controlling person, affiliate, or any combination of entities within the
insurance holding company system.

The commissioner may also issue subpoenas,
administer oaths, and examine under oath any person for purposes of determining
compliance with this section. Upon the failure or refusal of any person to
obey a subpoena, the commissioner may petition a court of competent
jurisdiction, and upon proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling
the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to
obey the court order shall be punishable as contempt of court. Every person
shall be obliged to attend as a witness at the place specified in the subpoena,
when subpoenaed, anywhere within the State. Every person shall be entitled to
the same fees and mileage, if claimed, as a witness in a court of record, which
fees, mileage, and actual expense, if any, necessarily incurred in securing the
attendance of witnesses, and their testimony, shall be itemized and charged
against, and be paid by, the company being examined.

(f) An examination of affiliates by the
commissioner under subsection (e) shall specify the grounds for the examination
and shall be confined to those specified grounds. [L 1987, c 349, pt of §8; am
L 2014, c 234, §12]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next